Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.150

Information on and curricula for the prevention of sexual abuse of students, child abuse, and neglect—Rules.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall collect and disseminate to school districts information on and curricula for the coordinated program for the prevention of sexual abuse of students in kindergarten through twelfth grade, child abuse, and neglect established in RCW 28A.300.160. The superintendent shall also adopt rules addressing the prevention of sexual abuse of students in kindergarten through twelfth grade and child abuse for purposes of curricula used in public schools.

(2) Effective July 1, 2018, the superintendent of public instruction and the department of children, youth, and families shall share relevant information in furtherance of this section.

(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, on or before June 30, 2019, the superintendent of public instruction must review any existing curricula related to the prevention of sexual abuse of students in kindergarten through twelfth grade. The review required by this subsection must evaluate the curricula for alignment with the provisions of RCW 28A.300.160(2).

[ 2018 c 64 s 2; 2006 c 263 s 705; 1994 c 245 s 8; 1987 c 489 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.03.512.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2018 c 64: See note following RCW 28A.300.160.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Intent—1987 c 489: "It is the intent of the legislature to make child abuse and neglect primary prevention education and training available to children, including preschool age children, parents, school employees, and licensed day care providers." [ 1987 c 489 s 1.]